Utah statutes.
20A-16-409.   Declaration.

A military-overseas ballot shall include or be accompanied by:

(1)  a declaration signed by a covered voter that a material misstatement of fact in completing the ballot may be grounds for a conviction of perjury under the laws of the United States or Title 76, Chapter 8, Part 5, Falsification in Official Matters; and

(2)  the following statement if the military-overseas ballot is electronically transmitted: "I understand that by electronically transmitting my voted ballot I am voluntarily waiving my right to a secret ballot.  Signature of voter ________________ Date _______".

